Washington statutes.
RCW 35.95.020

Definitions.

The following terms however used or referred to in this chapter, shall have the following meanings, unless a different meaning is required by the context:

(1) "Corporate authority" shall mean the council or other legislative body of a municipality.

(2) "Municipality" shall mean any incorporated city, town, county pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110, any county transportation authority created pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW, any public transportation benefit area created pursuant to chapter 36.57A RCW, or any metropolitan municipal corporation created pursuant to RCW 35.58.010, et seq: PROVIDED, That the term "municipality" shall mean in respect to any county performing the public transportation function pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 only that portion of the unincorporated area lying wholly within such unincorporated transportation benefit area.

(3) "Person" shall mean any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, school district or political subdivision of the state, fraternal, benevolent, religious or charitable society, club or organization, and shall include any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other person acting in a similar representative capacity. The term "person" shall not be construed to include the United States nor the state of Washington.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 145 s 65; 1965 ex.s. c 111 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 270: See notes following RCW 35.58.272.

Severability—Construction—1969 ex.s. c 255: See notes following RCW 35.58.272.